glossing/lexicons/verb_rules.lexc
LEXICON V-TV-PROG

! LEXICON V-TV-PROG-AOR == аорист имперфективный
! O SG1
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@ # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-2PL.S%&O%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>тык # ;
! @R.VPR.nil@%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@ # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-1SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>гым # ;
! O PL1
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.nil@ # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>мык # ;
! O SG2
@R.VPR.t@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.t@%>гыт # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.myt@%>гыт # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>гыт # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>гыт # ;
! O PL2
@R.VPR.t@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.t@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.myt@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>тык # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%-2PL.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>тык # ;
! O SG3
@R.VPR.t@:@R.VPR.t@ # ;
@R.VPR.myt@:@R.VPR.myt@ # ;
@R.VPR.nil@:@R.VPR.nil@ # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>ткы # ;
@R.VPR.nil@-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.nil@н # ;
@R.VPR.ne@:@R.VPR.ne@ # ;
! O PL3
@R.VPR.t@%-PL:@R.VPR.t@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%-PL:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>ткы # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-PL:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{Æ%}т # ;


! LEXICON V-TV-PROG-FUT == будущее имперфективное
! 1SG
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@ # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>тык # ;
! @R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@ # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-1SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>гым # ;
! 1PL
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.nil@ # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>мык # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>мык # ;
! 2SG
@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.t@%>гыт # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.myt@%>гыт # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>гыт # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>гыт # ;
! 2PL
@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.t@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.myt@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>тык # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>тык # ;
! 3SG
@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.t@ # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.myt@ # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.nil@ # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>ткы # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>н # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.ne@ # ;
! 3PL
@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]%-PL:@R.VPR.t@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]%-PL:@R.VPR.myt@%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>ткы # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@н%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-PL:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{Æ%}т # ;


! LEXICON V-TV-PROG-INTN == императив имперфективный

@R.VPR.q@%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@ # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@тык # ;
! @R.VPR.n@%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@ # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-1SG%.O%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.yn@гым # ;

@R.VPR.q@%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.q@ # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.q@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.yn@%>мык # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>мык # ;

@R.VPR.m@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.m@%>гыт # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.myn@%>гыт # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.yn@%>гыт # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.yn@%>гыт # ;

@R.VPR.m@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.m@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.myn@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.yn@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.yn@%>тык # ;

@R.VPR.m@:@R.VPR.m@ # ;
@R.VPR.myn@:@R.VPR.myn@ # ;
@R.VPR.q@:@R.VPR.q@ # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.q@%>ткы # ;
@R.VPR.n@%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.n@%>н # ;
@R.VPR.yn@:@R.VPR.yn@ # ;

@R.VPR.m@%-PL:@R.VPR.m@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%-PL:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-PL:@R.VPR.q@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.q@%>ткы # ;
@R.VPR.n@%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.n@%>н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-PL:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{Æ%}т # ;


! LEXICON V-TV-PROG-COND == кондиционал имперфективный

@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@ # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>тык # ;
! @R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@ # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-1SG%.O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}гым # ;

@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.n@ # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.n@%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}мык # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}мык # ;

@R.VPR.t@%[%+cond%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+cond%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;

@R.VPR.t@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! 3SG
@R.VPR.t@%[%+cond%]:@R.VPR.t@ # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]:@R.VPR.myn@ # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]:@R.VPR.n@ # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.n@%>ткы # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.n@%>н # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+cond%]:@R.VPR.ne@ # ;
! 3PL
@R.VPR.t@%[%+cond%]%-PL:@R.VPR.t@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%-PL:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-PL:@R.VPR.n@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.n@%>ткы # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.n@%>н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+cond%]%-PL:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{Æ%}т # ;
